Georgia, session 2025_26, HB328.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 2 of Chapter 7 of Title 48 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
income tax imposition, rate, computation, exemptions, and credits, is amended in Code
Section 48-7-29.16, relating to tax credits for contributions to student scholarship
organizations, by revising subsections (c.1), (e), and (f) as follows:
"(c.1) A business enterprise shall be allowed a credit against the tax imposed by Code
Section 33-8-4 in an amount equal to its qualified education expenses or 75 30 percent of
the business enterprise's state insurance premium tax liability owed pursuant to Code
H. B. 328 (SUB)
- 1 -

LC 50 1204S
Section 33-8-4, whichever is less; provided, however, that the amount of such credit shall
not exceed $1 million."
"(e) In no event shall the total amount of the tax credit allowed to any taxpayer or business
enterprise under this Code section for a taxable year exceed such taxpayer's income tax
liability or such business enterprise's state insurance premium tax liability owed pursuant
to Code Section 33-8-4, provided that any unused tax credit shall be allowed the taxpayer
or business enterprise against up to its succeeding three years' tax liability. No unused tax
credit shall be allowed the taxpayer or business enterprise against succeeding years' tax
liability. No such credit shall be allowed the taxpayer or business enterprise against prior
years' tax liability.
(f)(1) The aggregate amount of tax credits allowed under this Code section shall not
exceed:
(A) Fifty-eight million dollars for the year ending on December 31, 2018;
(B) For 2019 through 2022, $100 million per year; and
(C) For 2023 and all subsequent years, $120 $140 million per year.
(1.1) In no event shall the aggregate amount of tax credits allowed under this Code
section to all business enterprises for state insurance premium tax liability owed pursuant
to Code Section 33-8-4 exceed $6 million for any year.
(2) The commissioner shall allow the tax credits on a first come, first served basis.
(3) For the purposes of paragraph (1) of this subsection, a student scholarship
organization shall notify a potential donor of the requirements of this Code section.
Before making a contribution to a student scholarship organization, the taxpayer or
business enterprise shall electronically notify the department, in a manner specified by
the department, of the total amount of contributions that the taxpayer or business
enterprise intends to make to the student scholarship organization. The commissioner
shall preapprove, deny, or prorate the requested amount within 30 days after receiving
the request from the taxpayer or business enterprise and shall provide notice to the
H. B. 328 (SUB)
- 2 -

LC 50 1204S
taxpayer or business enterprise and the student scholarship organization of such
preapproval, denial, or proration which shall not require any signed release or notarized
approval by the taxpayer or business enterprise. In order to receive a tax credit under this
Code section, the taxpayer or business enterprise shall make the contribution to the
student scholarship organization within 60 days after receiving notice from the
department that the requested amount was preapproved. If the taxpayer or business
enterprise does not comply with this paragraph, the commissioner shall not include this
preapproved contribution amount when calculating the limit prescribed in paragraph (1)
of this subsection or the additional limitation specific to business enterprises prescribed
in paragraph (1.1) of this subsection. The department shall establish a web based
donation approval process to implement this subsection.
(4) Preapproval of contributions by the commissioner shall be based solely on the
availability of tax credits subject to the aggregate total limit established under paragraph
(1) of this subsection or the additional limitation specific to business enterprises
prescribed in paragraph (1.1) of this subsection. The department shall maintain an
ongoing, current list on its website of the amount of tax credits available under this Code
section.
(5)(A) For the period beginning on July 1 and ending on December 31 of each year,
to the extent that the aggregate amount of tax credits authorized by subsection (b) of
this Code section has not been reached, the commissioner shall preapprove, deny, or
prorate additional requested amounts on a first come, first served basis and shall
provide notice to such taxpayer and the qualified scholarship organization of such
preapproval, denial, or proration.
(B) A taxpayer that is preapproved for the tax credit allowed pursuant to this Code
section during the period provided for in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph shall only
be allowed such credit in an amount that shall not exceed 95 percent of the amount
otherwise allowed pursuant to this Code section.
H. B. 328 (SUB)
- 3 -

LC 50 1204S
(6) Notwithstanding any laws to the contrary, the department shall not take any adverse
action against donors to student scholarship organizations if the commissioner
preapproved a donation for a tax credit prior to the date the student scholarship
organization is removed from the Department of Education list pursuant to Code
Section 20-2A-7, and all such donations shall remain as preapproved tax credits subject
only to the donor's compliance with paragraph (3) of this subsection.
(6)(7) In addition to the reporting requirements in Code Section 20-2A-3, each student
scholarship organization shall file an annual report with the department showing any fees
or assessments retained by the student scholarship organization during the calendar year."
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2025, and shall be applicable to taxable years
beginning on or after January 1, 2026.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 328 (SUB)
- 4 -